lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.aff
FLAG num
SFX 775 Y 1
SFX 775 0 nne's .
SFX 1683 Y 1
SFX 1683 0 proofs .
SFX 3692 Y 1
SFX 3692 0 tar's .
SFX 4336 Y 1
SFX 4336 0 -blooded .
SFX 3925 Y 1
SFX 3925 0 ndale .
SFX 552 Y 1
SFX 552 0 dness's .
SFX 2803 Y 1
SFX 2803 0 lon .
SFX 2433 Y 1
SFX 2433 0 lor .
SFX 3305 Y 1
SFX 3305 0 lot .
SFX 2432 Y 1
SFX 2432 0 low .
SFX 1159 Y 1
SFX 1159 0 iousnesses .
SFX 3528 Y 1
SFX 3528 0 brushes .
SFX 2972 Y 1
SFX 2972 0 ament .
SFX 3207 Y 1
SFX 3207 0 rade .
SFX 3138 Y 1
SFX 3138 0 song .
SFX 1665 Y 1
SFX 1665 0 sons .
SFX 2795 Y 1
SFX 2795 0 mith's .
SFX 4984 Y 1
SFX 4984 0 leries .
SFX 4947 Y 1
SFX 4947 0 lus .
SFX 4708 Y 1
SFX 4708 0 rently .
SFX 418 Y 1
SFX 418 0 tered .
SFX 1050 Y 1
SFX 1050 0 terer .
SFX 2550 Y 1
SFX 2550 0 berries .
SFX 4574 Y 1
SFX 4574 0 sors .
SFX 2269 Y 1
SFX 2269 0 acting .
SFX 543 Y 1
SFX 543 0 lyn .
SFX 195 Y 1
SFX 195 0 age's .
SFX 2135 Y 1
SFX 2135 0 piness's .
SFX 2793 Y 1
SFX 2793 0 mo's .
SFX 1208 Y 1
SFX 1208 0 rals .
SFX 4601 Y 1
SFX 4601 0 shooter .
SFX 1681 Y 1
SFX 1681 0 rand .
SFX 3816 Y 1
SFX 3816 0 rant .
SFX 506 Y 1
SFX 506 0 tiest .
SFX 4109 Y 1
SFX 4109 0 icated .
SFX 4108 Y 1
SFX 4108 0 icates .
SFX 2964 Y 1
SFX 2964 0 ature .
SFX 2043 Y 1
SFX 2043 0 active .
SFX 994 Y 1
SFX 994 0 rate .
SFX 247 Y 1
SFX 247 0 la's .
SFX 2025 Y 1
SFX 2025 0 boarding .
SFX 2380 Y 1
SFX 2380 0 orously .
SFX 2907 Y 1
SFX 2907 0 essing .
SFX 2114 Y 1
SFX 2114 0 rinesses .
SFX 2090 Y 1
SFX 2090 0 stick's .
SFX 2947 Y 1
SFX 2947 0 breaker .
SFX 2767 Y 1
SFX 2767 0 nville .
SFX 4153 Y 1
SFX 4153 0 flow .
SFX 2378 Y 1
SFX 2378 0 pace .
SFX 3883 Y 1
SFX 3883 0 oding .
SFX 825 Y 1
SFX 825 0 ational .
SFX 3234 Y 1
SFX 3234 0 page .
SFX 2927 Y 1
SFX 2927 0 ect's .
SFX 463 Y 1
SFX 463 0 stone .
SFX 2974 Y 1
SFX 2974 0 aker .
SFX 3727 Y 1
SFX 3727 0 sley's .
SFX 2973 Y 1
SFX 2973 0 akes .
SFX 269 Y 1
SFX 269 0 liness's .
SFX 4404 Y 1
SFX 4404 0 ulus's .
SFX 4355 Y 1
SFX 4355 0 winds .
SFX 2337 Y 1
SFX 2337 0 storm .
SFX 248 Y 1
SFX 248 0 hip's .
SFX 4181 Y 1
SFX 4181 0 escent .
SFX 1751 Y 1
SFX 1751 0 iated .
SFX 1750 Y 1
SFX 1750 0 iates .
SFX 2256 Y 1
SFX 2256 0 aying .
SFX 2989 Y 1
SFX 2989 0 -seven .
SFX 3233 Y 1
SFX 3233 0 paper .
SFX 2739 Y 1
SFX 2739 0 ounds .
SFX 3175 Y 1
SFX 3175 0 rised .
SFX 2356 Y 1
SFX 2356 0 rises .
SFX 2263 Y 1
SFX 2263 0 aliser's .
SFX 1047 Y 1
SFX 1047 0 tinesses .
SFX 2054 Y 1
SFX 2054 0 walks .
SFX 1695 Y 1
SFX 1695 0 oons .
SFX 2993 Y 1
SFX 2993 0 -ninth .
SFX 1413 Y 1
SFX 1413 0 persons .
SFX 4867 Y 1
SFX 4867 0 niness's .
SFX 509 Y 1
SFX 509 0 room's .
SFX 3090 Y 1
SFX 3090 0 ther's .
SFX 3380 Y 1
SFX 3380 0 idness's .
SFX 1696 Y 1
SFX 1696 0 oon's .
SFX 3777 Y 1
SFX 3777 0 rship .
SFX 3223 Y 1
SFX 3223 0 playing .
SFX 4273 Y 1
SFX 4273 0 biness .
SFX 1212 Y 1
SFX 1212 0 pieces .
SFX 1615 Y 1
SFX 1615 0 dnesses .
SFX 2575 Y 1
SFX 2575 0 ace's .
SFX 1737 Y 1
SFX 1737 0 ington .
SFX 642 Y 1
SFX 642 0 io's .
SFX 2321 Y 1
SFX 2321 0 tick's .
SFX 1443 Y 1
SFX 1443 0 itude's .
SFX 4904 Y 1
SFX 4904 0 nant .
SFX 2955 Y 1
SFX 2955 0 bert's .
SFX 2222 Y 1
SFX 2222 0 flower's .
SFX 2937 Y 1
SFX 2937 0 ction .
SFX 4304 Y 1
SFX 4304 0 anised .
SFX 4303 Y 1
SFX 4303 0 anises .
SFX 2411 Y 1
SFX 2411 0 nard .
SFX 723 Y 1
SFX 723 0 bled .
SFX 1437 Y 1
SFX 1437 0 lation .
SFX 1469 Y 1
SFX 1469 0 iality .
SFX 865 Y 1
SFX 865 0 bler .
SFX 722 Y 1
SFX 722 0 bles .
SFX 1064 Y 1
SFX 1064 0 nness .
SFX 2756 Y 1
SFX 2756 0 oner's .
SFX 2790 Y 1
SFX 2790 0 nate .
SFX 2134 Y 1
SFX 2134 0 pinesses .
SFX 1760 Y 1
SFX 1760 0 ha's .
SFX 815 Y 1
SFX 815 0 iousness .
SFX 1482 Y 1
SFX 1482 0 erings .
SFX 3971 Y 1
SFX 3971 0 lot's .
SFX 1789 Y 1
SFX 1789 0 den's .
SFX 4300 Y 1
SFX 4300 0 anisms .
SFX 166 Y 1
SFX 166 0 ization's .
SFX 420 Y 1
SFX 420 0 ousness .
SFX 4242 Y 1
SFX 4242 0 cribe .
SFX 4025 Y 1
SFX 4025 0 lace .
SFX 65 Y 1
SFX 65 0 ism's .
SFX 3835 Y 1
SFX 3835 0 place's .
SFX 1414 Y 1
SFX 1414 0 person .
SFX 4782 Y 1
SFX 4782 0 orousness .
SFX 316 Y 1
SFX 316 0 edness's .
SFX 1427 Y 1
SFX 1427 0 nda .
SFX 3924 Y 1
SFX 3924 0 nde .
SFX 1907 Y 1
SFX 1907 0 nds .
SFX 1091 Y 1
SFX 1091 0 fields .
SFX 627 Y 1
SFX 627 0 dings .
SFX 4024 Y 1
SFX 4024 0 lain .
SFX 3934 Y 1
SFX 3934 0 nable .
SFX 778 Y 1
SFX 778 0 most .
SFX 4210 Y 1
SFX 4210 0 ellings .
SFX 4769 Y 1
SFX 4769 0 paces .
SFX 785 Y 1
SFX 785 0 gling .
SFX 4571 Y 1
SFX 4571 0 sport .
SFX 1422 Y 1
SFX 1422 0 nness's .
SFX 3569 Y 1
SFX 3569 0 -footed .
SFX 1766 Y 1
SFX 1766 0 flower .
SFX 1786 Y 1
SFX 1786 0 dler's .
SFX 3505 Y 1
SFX 3505 0 cript .
SFX 1003 Y 1
SFX 1003 0 nly .
SFX 1488 Y 1
SFX 1488 0 ected .
SFX 2332 Y 1
SFX 2332 0 taking .
SFX 898 Y 1
SFX 898 0 nna .
SFX 740 Y 1
SFX 740 0 nne .
SFX 1811 Y 1
SFX 1811 0 'd .
SFX 4728 Y 1
SFX 4728 0 rade's .
SFX 1 Y 1
SFX 1 0 's .
SFX 359 Y 1
SFX 359 0 linesses .
SFX 2069 Y 1
SFX 2069 0 ulars .
SFX 442 Y 1
SFX 442 0 heads .
SFX 1366 Y 1
SFX 1366 0 ulate .
SFX 532 Y 1
SFX 532 0 lie's .
SFX 3807 Y 1
SFX 3807 0 ressiveness's .
SFX 4324 Y 1
SFX 4324 0 aciousness .
SFX 267 Y 1
SFX 267 0 us's .
SFX 683 Y 1
SFX 683 0 nts .
SFX 2983 Y 1
SFX 2983 0 -sixth .
SFX 2680 Y 1
SFX 2680 0 sia's .
SFX 3331 Y 1
SFX 3331 0 lays .
SFX 4045 Y 1
SFX 4045 0 ivation's .
SFX 3487 Y 1
SFX 3487 0 ector .
SFX 1311 Y 1
SFX 1311 0 manship's .
SFX 2495 Y 1
SFX 2495 0 hands .
SFX 168 Y 1
SFX 168 0 ler's .
SFX 3016 Y 1
SFX 3016 0 zers .
SFX 2560 Y 1
SFX 2560 0 ariness's .
SFX 1391 Y 1
SFX 1391 0 sen's .
SFX 310 Y 1
SFX 310 0 te's .
SFX 1621 Y 1
SFX 1621 0 berg's .
SFX 1816 Y 1
SFX 1816 0 writers .
SFX 4486 Y 1
SFX 4486 0 tina's .
SFX 1630 Y 1
SFX 1630 0 -handed .
SFX 4993 Y 1
SFX 4993 0 lecting .
SFX 1796 Y 1
SFX 1796 0 cases .
SFX 3470 Y 1
SFX 3470 0 eo's .
SFX 3904 Y 1
SFX 3904 0 ninesses .
SFX 1513 Y 1
SFX 1513 0 well's .
SFX 3142 Y 1
SFX 3142 0 sings .
SFX 2861 Y 1
SFX 2861 0 idnesses .
SFX 2751 Y 1
SFX 2751 0 ooned .
SFX 517 Y 1
SFX 517 0 p's .
SFX 4797 Y 1
SFX 4797 0 ooner .
SFX 1885 Y 1
SFX 1885 0 pet's .
SFX 2074 Y 1
SFX 2074 0 trap .
SFX 483 Y 1
SFX 483 0 da's .
SFX 1184 Y 1
SFX 1184 0 word's .
SFX 2073 Y 1
SFX 2073 0 tree .
SFX 1383 Y 1
SFX 1383 0 stands .
SFX 3407 Y 1
SFX 3407 0 hiness's .
SFX 3674 Y 1
SFX 3674 0 thiest .
SFX 3987 Y 1
SFX 3987 0 lizer's .
SFX 3560 Y 1
SFX 3560 0 ada .
SFX 1508 Y 1
SFX 1508 0 ade .
SFX 4012 Y 1
SFX 4012 0 lects .
SFX 4917 Y 1
SFX 4917 0 mitting .
SFX 3758 Y 1
SFX 3758 0 sdal .
SFX 2207 Y 1
SFX 2207 0 horse .
SFX 2245 Y 1
SFX 2245 0 dened .
SFX 4547 Y 1
SFX 4547 0 structure's .
SFX 496 Y 1
SFX 496 0 ousness's .
SFX 3632 Y 1
SFX 3632 0 ulsion's .
SFX 4312 Y 1
SFX 4312 0 ala .
SFX 4311 Y 1
SFX 4311 0 ald .
SFX 1266 Y 1
SFX 1266 0 ale .
SFX 1265 Y 1
SFX 1265 0 all .
SFX 137 Y 1
SFX 137 0 als .
SFX 449 Y 1
SFX 449 0 ure's .
SFX 4861 Y 1
SFX 4861 0 nists .
SFX 2986 Y 1
SFX 2986 0 -sevenths .
SFX 711 Y 1
SFX 711 0 ious .
SFX 725 Y 1
SFX 725 0 ana .
SFX 1354 Y 1
SFX 1354 0 and .
SFX 1353 Y 1
SFX 1353 0 ane .
SFX 2566 Y 1
SFX 2566 0 ang .
SFX 4307 Y 1
SFX 4307 0 ani .
SFX 1036 Y 1
SFX 1036 0 ann .
SFX 1805 Y 1
SFX 1805 0 ano .
SFX 278 Y 1
SFX 278 0 ans .
SFX 226 Y 1
SFX 226 0 ant .
SFX 2564 Y 1
SFX 2564 0 any .
SFX 721 Y 1
SFX 721 0 book's .
SFX 2968 Y 1
SFX 2968 0 ara .
SFX 354 Y 1
SFX 354 0 ard .
SFX 2559 Y 1
SFX 2559 0 arm .
SFX 918 Y 1
SFX 918 0 ars .
SFX 2966 Y 1
SFX 2966 0 art .
SFX 245 Y 1
SFX 245 0 ary .
SFX 2879 Y 1
SFX 2879 0 hiness .
SFX 142 Y 1
SFX 142 0 ate .
SFX 4457 Y 1
SFX 4457 0 traction .
SFX 2556 Y 1
SFX 2556 0 ats .
SFX 1098 Y 1
SFX 1098 0 ednesses .
SFX 816 Y 1
SFX 816 0 iously .
SFX 1883 Y 1
SFX 1883 0 phones .
SFX 954 Y 1
SFX 954 0 master .
SFX 2336 Y 1
SFX 2336 0 storms .
SFX 3578 Y 1
SFX 3578 0 written .
SFX 3345 Y 1
SFX 3345 0 itation's .
SFX 573 Y 1
SFX 573 0 lee's .
SFX 2482 Y 1
SFX 2482 0 ician .
SFX 1898 Y 1
SFX 1898 0 nnesses .
SFX 4632 Y 1
SFX 4632 0 screen .
SFX 452 Y 1
SFX 452 0 nces .
SFX 4328 Y 1
SFX 4328 0 ac .
SFX 4318 Y 1
SFX 4318 0 ad .
SFX 4316 Y 1
SFX 4316 0 ae .
SFX 667 Y 1
SFX 667 0 ibility .
SFX 726 Y 1
SFX 726 0 ah .
SFX 2243 Y 1
SFX 2243 0 diness's .
SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28 0 al .
