lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.dic
Lea/1,13,15,40,103,116,128,149,298,461,740,775,898,947,1908,1933,2184,2398,2399,2406,3266,3267,4142,4849,4850
Marcel/68,94,219,304,1451,1723,1724,1918,1944,2172,4946,4947
Marti/2153,2767,3925,4846,4847
Maxi/2419,2793
Noel/1,2,49,88,107,125,233,247,543,555,1041,1042,4307
Rosette/2767
Whit/1,8,16,21,69,78,146,294,323,339,346,450,550,588,589,651,956,987,1070,1513,2432,2974,3507,3694,3696,3970,4267,4314,4537
deter/2,14,41,42,44,179,184,1855,2721,3188,3189,3948,4586,4707,4708,4713
elder/2,5,20,238,269,389,1766,1800,2027,2550
eta/1,2,2803
gal/1,2,8,16,21,30,33,46,49,52,83,107,160,194,294,346,532,726,1148,1417,1485,1778,2382,2442,2803,3308,3333,3334,4006,4007,4984
grand/5,10,11,17,38,187,202,229,255,384,709,954,1066,1067,1068,1383,1530,1665,1711,1888,2091,2140,2219,2507,2570,2896,3428,3516,3551,3711,4251,4765
host/2907,2908
hot/2,5,10,11,17,48,57,82,193,219,221,225,319,327,363,371,400,424,442,818,823,833,917,940,1103,1259,1269,1293,1345,1406,1409,1687,1759,1803,1979,2102,2129,3409,3437,3538,3724,4133,4134,4336
misguide/2,6,7,13,15,211,403,552
ope/2,6,994,1058,1298,1403,1404,1405,1537,1681,1874,2365,3815,3816
pal/1,2,3,4,5,8,9,16,29,32,38,46,49,52,107,115,142,160,190,231,237,282,290,306,380,409,410,453,467,494,498,513,521,542,571,646,659,788,820,907,934,953,1280,1560,1691,1708,1808,2273,2433,2575,2802,2815,2816,3306,4591,4979
play/2,3,4,9,12,14,29,35,108,165,177,186,205,240,319,371,375,400,410,444,464,489,501,509,521,585,632,679,738,953,1001,1037,1048,1065,1102,1146,1178,1261,1309,1314,1652,2044,2268,2269,2270,2283,2377,2496,2592,2593,2887,2888,2889,2890,3089,3414,3415,3839,4141,4144,4276,4277,4346,4349,4494
plot/1,2,48,57,82,119,127,418,437,487,515,584,655
pot/1,2,35,48,55,57,60,62,82,108,119,127,157,167,186,195,299,301,324,327,349,376,401,418,424,432,437,442,450,482,502,506,538,596,671,718,856,908,962,963,1021,1050,1089,1134,1163,1293,1337,1471,1484,1528,1541,1653,1849,1969,1970,2081,2102,2136,2233,2531,2664,3096,3097
quad/178,216,872,890,986,994,1184,3816
quo/182,213,454,499,617,742,994,1076,1082,1160,1317,1318
radio/1,2,3,4,69,78,90,112,766,875,952,1010,1142,1474,1475,1564,1565,1716,1717,1718,1762,1883,1884,1916,1917,1974,2043,2137,2210,2211,2212,2497,2498,2500,2797,3055,3292,3293,3309,3628,4403,4503
rearm/2970,2971,2972
reg/2,55,60,62,324,478,482,546,572,630,684,753,1021,1296,1337,1355,1484,2109,2190,2265,2467,2471,2472,3165,3185,3207,3351,3352,3367,3385,3386,3387,3555,3556,4060,4061,4062,4070,4071,4703,4727,4904
rut/1,2,48,57,157,450,506
sap/1,2,46,50,109,113,207,249,250,251,312,326,448,466,609,610,728,1688,2134,2135,4092,4093,4094,4543
sharp/2,3,4,5,9,10,11,12,14,17,31,37,38,53,61,83,224,296,297,535,821,3738,3739,4601
sing/35,51,410,498,521,926,1367,2002,2069,2070,3056,3138,3327,4011,4411,4412,4413,4414,4415,4988
slap/1,2,109,113,207,258,1287,1663,2090
son/1,2,5,43,148,254,264,333,337,484,643,708,867,918,948,1140,1810,2157,2380,2381,3769,4782
sophist/1,2,9,12,43,103,128,141,148,254,353,3390,3391,3393,4107,4108,4109,4111
spec/1,2,37,53,61,82,119,127,140,174,200,220,227,418,594,620,621,622,711,745,782,815,816,817,851,926,1087,1159,1239,1362,1363,1364,1365,1366,1367,1466,1520,1521,1775,1811,2070,2183,2446,2447,2448,3378,3634,3635,3636,4462
spoil/2,3,4,9,12,14,26,167,185,195,538,4571
supers/3692,4239,4240,4241,4467,4533
surf/1,2,3,4,9,12,14,29,32,284,330,374,1808,2025,2252,2273,2573,2574,2575
temper/194,365,415,433,1352,2963,2964,2965,2970,2971,2972,3543,4287
tempo/1208,2725
tooth/50,129,164,172,606,1124,1199,1221,1629,2271,2272,2944,3507,3528,3529,4748,4749
water/1,2,3,4,9,12,18,29,32,34,36,50,56,69,72,74,78,90,112,219,287,313,356,367,379,430,760,807,838,856,887,962,975,1221,1310,1596,1683,1712,1769,1770,1858,1978,2011,2012,2125,2126,2169,2221,2425,2796,3024,3025,3144,3433,3534,4925
wood/1,2,3,4,18,34,36,37,56,69,72,74,78,83,90,203,273,300,350,356,360,367,380,428,438,439,508,535,540,837,886,911,922,1096,1272,1273,1274,1512,1729,1773,1792,1858,1990,2011,2012,2013,2014,2051,2597,2933,3143,3304,3305,3312,3497,3506,3583,4202,4236,4355,4747
